Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF409.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2604XS (2) 91 as/js S.F. 409 Section 1. Section 906.5, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. Not less than twenty days prior to conducting a hearing 3 at which the board will interview the person, the board 4 shall notify the department of corrections of the scheduling 5 of the interview, and the department shall make the person 6 available to the board at the personâs institutional residence 7 as scheduled in the notice. However, if health, safety, or 8 security conditions require moving the person to another 9 institution or facility prior to the scheduled interview, 10 the department of corrections shall so notify the board. If 11 the interview is conducted electronically, recording of the 12 proceedings by any party is prohibited, and redistribution 13 or posting of such recordings on the internet or through any 14 other medium is prohibited. A violation of this paragraph 15 constitutes a serious misdemeanor. 16